Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.545

Grants for undergraduate coursework for recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence.

Students named by the workforce training and education coordinating board after June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550 shall be eligible to receive a grant for undergraduate coursework as authorized under RCW 28B.76.670.

[ 2015 c 55 s 220; 2004 c 275 s 50; 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 7; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 20; 1992 c 231 s 18; 1987 c 231 s 1; 1985 c 390 s 31; 1984 c 267 s 6.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Severability—1995 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 28C.04.520.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.